Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20133-308
Zoning regulations;
procedure for adoption; commission; appointment; preliminary report; public
hearings; final report.

Prior to the initial zoning
of any airport hazard area under the
Airport Zoning Act, the political subdivision or joint airport
zoning board which is to adopt the regulations shall appoint a commission,
to be known as the airport zoning commission, to recommend the boundaries
of the various zones to be established and the regulations to be adopted therefor.
Such commission shall make a preliminary report and hold public hearings thereon
before submitting its final report. The legislative body of the political
subdivision or the joint airport zoning board shall not hold its public hearings
or take other action until it has received the final report of such commission. If a city or
county planning commission or a joint
or interjurisdictional planning commission already exists, it
may be appointed as the airport zoning commission.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 5(2), p. 685;

Laws 2013, LB140, § 8.